test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-jokk-Hom1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - jokk â-stem: # Noun 'river' - full paradigm
     jokk+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom: jokk
     jokk+Hom1+N+Sg+Gen: jooǥǥ
     jokk+Hom1+N+Sg+Acc: jooǥǥ
     jokk+Hom1+N+Sg+Ill: joʹǩǩe
     jokk+Hom1+N+Sg+Loc: jooǥǥâst
     jokk+Hom1+N+Sg+Com: jooǥǥin
     jokk+Hom1+N+Ess: jokkân
     jokk+Hom1+N+Par: jokkâd
     jokk+Hom1+N+Sg+Abe: [jooǥǥtaa, jooǥǥtää]
     jokk+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom: jooǥǥ
     jokk+Hom1+N+Pl+Gen: jooǥǥi
     jokk+Hom1+N+Pl+Acc: jooǥǥid
     jokk+Hom1+N+Pl+Ill: jooǥǥid
     jokk+Hom1+N+Pl+Loc: jooǥǥin
     jokk+Hom1+N+Pl+Com: jooǥǥivuiʹm
     jokk+Hom1+N+Pl+Abe: [jooǥǥitaa, jooǥǥitää]
     jokk+Hom1+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: jooǥǥâž
